2018-komp-ling/practicals/Practical2/HFST/d_lexc.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное
%{'%}                ! fdmndf
%>                   ! morph
%<pos%>              ! fklgdfsjgfdj
   
LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: Pos ;

LEXICON Pos
 
             # ;
%<pos%>:%>'s # ;

LEXICON Nouns

dog : dog N ;     
snail : snail N ;  
cat : cat N ;     
fox : fox N ;   
horse : horse N;
